test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-38kubwl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - "kubõl, kupl": # Noun (38) "kubõl, kupl" 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kubõl+N+Sg+Nom: [kubõl, kupl]
     kubõl+N+Sg+Gen: kubla
     kubõl+N+Sg+Par: kupla
     kubõl+N+Sg+Ill: kupla
     kubõl+N+Sg+Ine: [kublan, kublah, kublahn]
     kubõl+N+Sg+Ela: kublast
     kubõl+N+Sg+All: kublalõ
     kubõl+N+Sg+Ade: kublal
     kubõl+N+Sg+Abl: kublalt
     kubõl+N+Sg+Tra: kublas
     kubõl+N+Sg+Ter: kublaniq
     kubõl+N+Sg+Abe: kublaldaq
     kubõl+N+Sg+Com: kublagaq
     kubõl+N+Pl+Nom: kublaq
     kubõl+N+Pl+Gen: kuplõ
     kubõl+N+Pl+Par: kuplõ
     kubõl+N+Pl+Ill: [kuplõhe, kuplõ, kuplõdõ]
     kubõl+N+Pl+Ine: [kublõn, kublõh, kublõhn]
     kubõl+N+Pl+Ela: kublõst
     kubõl+N+Pl+All: kublõlõ
     kubõl+N+Pl+Ade: kublõl
     kubõl+N+Pl+Abl: kublõlt
     kubõl+N+Pl+Tra: kublõs
     kubõl+N+Pl+Ter: kublõniq
     kubõl+N+Pl+Abe: kublõldaq
     kubõl+N+Pl+Com: kuplõgaq
